Colorado, session 2026A, HB1163.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of natural
resources for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of
Colorado 2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part XV as
Part XV (5)(A), the affected totals, and footnote 79 are amended by Session
Laws of Colorado 2025, First Extraordinary Session, section 3 of chapter
4, (SB25B-005), as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART XV
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
(1) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S OFFICE
(A) Administration76
Personal Services 6,390,733 255,055 67,494a 6,068,184b
(59.2 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 28,848,966 4,344,229 23,634,735a 405,922b 464,080(I)
29,719,115 4,383,369 24,422,954a 435,390b 477,402(I)
Short-term Disability 124,481 16,458 101,879a 3,935b 2,209(I)
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 786,841 105,800 641,539a 25,299b 14,203(I)
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 17,485,336 2,351,112 14,256,402a 562,192b 315,630(I)
Salary Survey 4,728,328 644,204 3,842,730a 154,353b 87,041(I)
Step Pay 830,983 168,947 634,426a 27,610b
PERA Direct Distribution 3,250,765 501,079 2,643,512a 106,174b
Shift Differential 507,624 507,624a
Workers' Compensation 1,394,381 10,424 1,369,093a 2,147b 12,717(I)
Operating Expenses 295,356 3,427 950a 290,979b
Legal Services 8,248,791 2,598,589 5,477,590a 106,990b 65,622(I)
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 3,532,751 140,667 3,354,581a 23,240b 14,263(I)
Vehicle Lease Payments 9,207,001 1,245,214 7,870,869a 22,646b 68,272(I)
6,901,523 608,643 6,227,080a 22,646b 43,154(I)
Capital Outlay 1,062,343 1,057,006a 5,337(I)
Information Technology
Asset Maintenance 882,819 123,076 647,509a 112,234b
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1163

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Leased Space 2,031,434 775,806 1,220,009a 5,905b 29,714(I)
Capitol Complex Leased
Space 939,891 298,122 337,281a 141,659b 162,829(I)
Payments to OIT 19,643,096 3,484,556 15,433,898a 465,005b 259,637(I)
17,451,341 3,276,923 13,542,009a 407,648b 224,761(I)
CORE Operations 134,921 10,225 117,615a 3,278b 3,803(I)
Digital Trunk Radio
Payments 1,943,510 1,943,510a
Species Conservation Trust
Fund 5,000,000 5,000,000a
Wildfire Mitigation
Capacity Development
Fund 5,000,000 5,000,000a
122,270,351
118,643,267
a Of these amounts, an estimated $41,689,045 $40,001,915 shall be from the Wildlife Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $22,710,694 $21,940,617 shall
be from the Parks and Outdoor Recreation Cash Fund created in Section 33-10-111 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $12,557,617 $12,573,811 shall be from the Severance Tax Operational Fund
created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S., an estimated $10,061,178 $9,883,584 shall be from the Energy and Carbon Management Cash Fund created in Section 34-60-122 (5), C.R.S.,
an estimated $4,160,408 $4,058,751 shall be from the State Land Board Trust Administration Fund created in Section 36-1-145 (2)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $3,054,545 $3,019,001 shall
be from the Colorado Water Conservation Board Construction Fund created in Section 37-60-121 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $280,037 $283,605 shall be from the Water Plan
Implementation Cash Fund created in Section 37-60-123.3 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $224,560 shall be from the Species Conservation Trust Fund created in Section 24-33-111 (2)(a)(I)(A),
C.R.S., an estimated $40,288 shall be from the Water Resources Cash Fund created in Section 37-80-111.7 (1), C.R.S., and an estimated $381,880 $386,661 shall be from various sources
of cash funds. The appropriation from the Severance Tax Operational Fund is made in accordance with allocations specified in Section 39-29-109.3 (1), C.R.S.
b Of these amounts, $6,797,963 $6,764,152 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.,
$1,449,321 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S., and $280,468 $286,390 shall be from
the Department of Transportation. Pursuant to Section 24-33-116 (2)(c)(I)(B), C.R.S., the amount from the Department of Transportation is continuously appropriated to the Colorado
Avalanche Information Center and is shown for informational purposes only.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1163

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(B) Special Programs
Colorado Avalanche
Information Center 2,571,784 1,718,032a 834,781(I)b 18,971(I)
(22.7 FTE)
Colorado River Program 325,042 325,042a
(2.0 FTE)
Colorado Produced Water
Consortium 238,038 238,038a
(2.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 133,236 133,236a
3,268,100
a Of these amounts, $1,000,000 shall be from the Colorado Avalanche Information Center Fund created in Section 24-33-116 (2)(c)(I)(A), C.R.S., $849,268 shall be from the Severance
Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S., $325,042 shall be from the Colorado Water Conservation Board Construction Fund created in Section 37-60-121 (1)(a),
C.R.S., $238,038 shall be from the Energy and Carbon Management Cash Fund created in Section 34-60-122 (5)(a), C.R.S., and $2,000 shall be from the Snowmobile Recreation Fund
created in Section 33-14-106 (1)(a), C.R.S. The appropriation from the Severance Tax Operational Fund is made in accordance with allocations specified in Section 39-29-109.3 (1)(b.5),
C.R.S.
b This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Transportation from the State Highway Fund and is shown for informational purposes only in accordance with Section
24-33-116 (2)(c)(I)(B), C.R.S.
125,538,451
121,911,367
(2) DIVISION OF RECLAMATION, MINING, AND SAFETY
(A) Coal Land Reclamation
Program Costs 2,150,814 505,066a 1,645,748(I)b
(19.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 89,018 18,694a 70,324(I)b
2,239,832
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1163

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a These amounts shall be from the Severance Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S. The appropriations from the Severance Tax Operational Fund are made
in accordance with allocations specified in Section 39-29-109.3 (1)(c), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from the United States Office of Surface Mining and Reclamation Enforcement and are shown for informational purposes only.
(B) Inactive Mines
Program Costs77 2,828,018 1,250,384a 1,577,634(I)
(17.8 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 202,570 76,941a 125,629(I)
3,030,588
a These amounts shall be from the Severance Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S. The appropriations from the Severance Tax Operational Fund are made
in accordance with allocations specified in Section 39-29-109.3 (1)(c), C.R.S.
(C) Minerals
Program Costs 2,683,347
(23.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 113,400
2,796,747 2,796,747a
a Of this amount, $1,748,956 shall be from the Severance Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S., and $1,047,791 shall be from the Mined Land Reclamation
Fund created in Section 34-32-127 (1)(a), C.R.S. The appropriation from the Severance Tax Operational Fund is made in accordance with allocations specified in Section 39-29-109.3
(1)(c), C.R.S.
(D) Mines Program
Colorado and Federal Mine
Safety Program 579,581 381,597a 197,984(I)
(4.0 FTE)
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1163

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Blaster Certification
Program 145,302 37,642a 107,660(I)
(1.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 15,404 6,093a 9,311(I)
740,287
a Of these amounts, $415,392 shall be from the Severance Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S., and $9,940 shall be from fees credited to the Office of Active
and Inactive Mines Operation Fund created in Section 34-24-103 (5)(a), C.R.S. The appropriation from the Severance Tax Operational Fund is made in accordance with allocations
specified in Section 39-29-109.3 (1)(c), C.R.S.
8,807,454
(3) ENERGY AND CARBON MANAGEMENT COMMISSION
Program Costs 22,258,626 22,258,626a
(202.5FTE)
Underground Injection
Program 96,559 96,559(I)
(2.0 FTE)
Orphaned Well Mitigation
Enterprise 9,500,000 9,500,000(I)b
Environmental Assistance
and Complaint Resolution 312,033 312,033c
Emergency Response78 150,000 150,000c
Special Environmental
Protection and Mitigation
Studies 325,000 325,000c
Indirect Cost Assessment 920,675 866,070c 54,605(I)
33,562,893
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1163

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, $16,110,559 shall be from the Energy and Carbon Management Cash Fund created in Section 34-60-122 (5)(a), C.R.S., and $6,148,067 shall be from the Severance
Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S. The appropriation from the Severance Tax Operational Fund is made in accordance with allocations specified in Section
39-29-109.3 (1)(a), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Orphaned Wells Mitigation Enterprise created in Section 34-60-133 (1)(a), C.R.S. and is shown for informational purposes.
c These amounts shall be from the Energy and Carbon Management Cash Fund created in Section 34-60-122 (5)(a), C.R.S.
(4) STATE BOARD OF LAND COMMISSIONERS
Program Costs 6,438,647
(49.9 FTE)
Public Access Program
Damage and Enhancement
Costs 225,000
Indirect Cost Assessment 275,209
6,938,856 6,713,856a 225,000b
a Of this amount, $6,638,856 shall be from the State Land Board Trust Administration Fund created in Section 36-1-145 (2)(a), C.R.S., and $75,000 shall be from the State Board of Land
Commissioners Land and Water Management Fund created in Section 36-1-148 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be transferred from the Wildlife Operations line item appropriation in the Division of Parks and Wildlife. The reappropriated funds originate from the Wildlife Cash
Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(5) DIVISION OF PARKS AND WILDLIFE
(A) Colorado Parks and Wildlife Operations
State Park Operations 64,834,343 63,934,343a 900,000(I)b
(332.1 FTE)
Wildlife Operations79, 80 134,109,239 1,883,444 97,525,795c 34,700,000(I)
134,234,239 97,650,795c
(731.8 FTE)
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1163

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Vendor Commissions,
Fulfillment Fees, and Credit
Card Fees 11,684,700 11,684,700d
210,628,282
210,753,282
a Of these amounts, $49,667,313 shall be from the Parks and Outdoor Recreation Cash Fund created in Section 33-10-111 (1), C.R.S., $8,800,000(I) shall be from the Great Outdoors
Colorado Program established in Section 1 of Article XXVII of the State Constitution, $2,459,306(I) shall be from Lottery proceeds pursuant to Section 3 of Article XXVII of the State
Constitution, $2,243,971 shall be from the Severance Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S., $641,063 shall be from the Off-highway Vehicle Recreation
Fund created in Section 33-14.5-106 (1), C.R.S., and $122,690 shall be from the Snowmobile Recreation Fund created in Section 33-14-106 (1)(a), C.R.S. The appropriation from the
Severance Tax Operational Fund is made in accordance with allocations specified in Section 39-29-109.3 (1)(f), C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 3 of Article XXVII of the State Constitution,
amounts appropriated from the Great Outdoors Colorado Program and lottery proceeds are continuously appropriated and are shown for informational purposes only.
b This amount shall be from various sources of federal funds, including funds anticipated to be received from the United States Bureau of Reclamation through a cost-sharing agreement
to address the net operating deficit of Paonia, Vega, Rifle Gap, Crawford, Navajo, Mancos, and Ridgway State Parks, and is shown for informational purposes only.
c Of these amounts, $84,110,795 THIS AMOUNT, $84,235,795 shall be from the Wildlife Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., $8,800,000(I) shall be from the Great
Outdoors Colorado Program established in Section 1 of Article XXVII of the State Constitution, $3,000,000 shall be from the Wildlife Management Public Education Fund created in
Section 33-1-112 (3.5)(a), C.R.S., $700,000 shall be from the Wolf Depredation Compensation Fund created in Section 33-1-128 (2)(a), C.R.S., $500,000 shall be from subscription
revenues credited to the Colorado Outdoors Magazine Revolving Fund created in Section 33-1-114 (1), C.R.S., $400,000 shall be from the Colorado Nongame Conservation and Wildlife
Restoration Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-125 (1)(a), C.R.S., and $15,000 shall be from the Federal Aid Projects Income Fund created in Section 33-1-119, C.R.S. Pursuant to Section
3 of Article XXVII of the State Constitution, amounts appropriated from the Great Outdoors Colorado Program and lottery proceeds are continuously appropriated and are shown for
informational purposes only.
d Of this amount, an estimated $10,000,000 shall be from the Wildlife Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $1,350,000 shall be from the Parks and Outdoor
Recreation Cash Fund created in Section 33-10-111 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $250,000 shall be from the Off-highway Vehicle Recreation Fund created in Section 33-14.5-106 (1), C.R.S.,
an estimated $31,700 shall be from the sale of migratory waterfowl stamps pursuant to Section 33-4-102.5 (2), C.R.S., and an estimated $53,000 shall be from the Snowmobile Recreation
Fund created in Section 33-14-106 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(B) Special Purpose
Snowmobile Program 1,047,931 1,047,931a
(1.3 FTE)
River Outfitters Regulation 154,624 154,624b
(0.5 FTE)
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1163

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Off-highway Vehicle
Program Support 636,805 636,805c
(3.0 FTE)
Off-highway Vehicle Direct
Services81 6,000,000 6,000,000c
Stores Revolving Fund 200,000 200,000(I)d
Information Technology 2,605,016 2,605,016e
Severance Tax for Aquatic
Nuisance Species 4,006,005 4,006,005f
Game Damage Claims and
Prevention 1,282,500 1,282,500g
Grants and Habitat
Partnerships82 2,375,000 2,375,000h
Outdoor Equity Grant
Program83 4,000,000 4,000,000i
Asset Maintenance and
Repairs84 10,100,000 10,100,000j
Annual Depreciation-lease
Equivalent Payment 68,232 68,232
Beaver Park Dam
Repayment 333,334 333,334g
Chatfield Reallocation
Repayment 276,700 276,700g
Indirect Cost Assessment 5,801,551 5,045,640k 755,911(I)
38,887,698
a This amount shall be from the Snowmobile Recreation Fund created in Section 33-14-106 (1), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $116,124 shall be from the River Outfitters Cash Fund created in Section 33-32-111, C.R.S., and $38,500 shall be from the Parks and Outdoor Recreation Cash Fund
created in Section 33-10-111 (1), C.R.S.
c These amounts shall be from the Off-highway Vehicle Recreation Fund created in Section 33-14.5-106 (1), C.R.S.
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1163

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
d This amount shall be from the Stores Revolving Fund created in Section 33-10-111.5 (4), C.R.S., and is continuously appropriated and is shown for informational purposes only.
e Of this amount, $1,330,047 shall be from the Wildlife Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., $674,969(I) shall be from lottery proceeds pursuant to Section 3 of Article
XXVII of the State Constitution, and $600,000 shall be from the Parks and Outdoor Recreation Cash Fund created in Section 33-10-111 (1), C.R.S. Lottery proceeds are continuously
appropriated pursuant to Section 3 of Article XXVII of the State Constitution and are shown for informational purposes only.
f This amount shall be from the Severance Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S.
g These amounts shall be from the Wildlife Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (1)(a), C.R.S.
h Of this amount, $1,600,000 shall be from the Wildlife Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., $400,000 shall be from the sale of migratory waterfowl stamps pursuant
to Section 33-4-102.5 (2), C.R.S., and $375,000 shall be from the Parks and Outdoor Recreation Cash Fund created in Section 33-10-111 (1), C.R.S.
i Of this amount, $3,000,000 shall be from the Outdoor Equity Fund created in Section 33-9-206 (1)(a), C.R.S., $500,000 shall be from the Wildlife Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-112
(1)(a), C.R.S., and $500,000 shall be from the Parks and Outdoor Recreation Cash Fund created in Section 33-10-111 (1), C.R.S.
j Of this amount, $6,300,000 shall be from the Wildlife Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., and $3,800,000(I) shall be from lottery proceeds pursuant to Section 3 of
Article XXVII of the State Constitution. Lottery proceeds are continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 3 of Article XXVII of the State Constitution and are shown for informational
purposes only.
k Of this amount, $2,904,964 shall be from the Wildlife Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., $1,862,965 shall be from the Parks and Outdoor Recreation Cash Fund
created in Section 33-10-111 (1), C.R.S., and $277,711 shall be from the Severance Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S. The appropriation from the
Severance Tax Operational Fund is made in accordance with allocations specified in Section 39-29-109.3 (1)(f), C.R.S.
249,515,980
249,640,980
(6) COLORADO WATER CONSERVATION BOARD
(A) Administration
Personal Services 5,214,503
(43.9 FTE)
Operating Expenses 653,072
River Decision Support
Systems 569,677
(4.0 FTE)
6,437,252 6,437,252a
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1163

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, $5,480,603 shall be from the Colorado Water Conservation Board Construction Fund created in Section 37-60-121 (1)(a), C.R.S., $621,312 shall be from the Water
Plan Implementation Cash Fund created in Section 37-60-123.3 (a), C.R.S., $291,587 shall be from the Wildlife Cash Fund created in Section 33-1-112 (1)(a), C.R.S., and $43,750 shall
be from the Severance Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S. The appropriation from the Severance Tax Operational Fund is made in accordance with
allocations specified in Section 39-29-109.3 (1)(d), C.R.S.
(B) Special Purpose
Intrastate Water
Management and
Development 361,821 361,821a
Federal Emergency
Management Assistance 546,649 83,732a 462,917(I)
(4.0 FTE)
Water Conservation
Program 570,806 570,806a
(5.0 FTE)
Water Efficiency Grant
Program 624,845 624,845b
(1.0 FTE)
Severance Tax Fund 1,205,500 1,205,500c
Interbasin Compacts 1,243,182 1,243,182d
(3.7 FTE)
Platte River Basin
Cooperative Agreement 264,941 264,941e
(1.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 639,790 493,720a 146,070(I)
5,457,534
a Of these amounts, $1,440,079 shall be from the Colorado Water Conservation Board Construction Fund created in Section 37-60-121 (1)(a), C.R.S. and $70,000 shall be from the
Severance Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S. The appropriation from the Severance Tax Operational Fund is made in accordance with allocations specified
in Section 39-29-109.3 (1)(d), C.R.S.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1163

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b Of this amount, $498,788(I) shall be from the Water Efficiency Grant Program Cash Fund created in Section 37-60-126 (12)(a)(I), C.R.S., and $126,057 shall be from the Colorado
Water Conservation Board Construction Fund created in Section 37-60-121 (1)(a), C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 37-60-106 (12)(a)(II), C.R.S., the amount from the Water Efficiency Grant
Program Cash Fund is continuously appropriated to the Colorado Water Conservation Board and is shown for informational purposes only.
c This amount shall be from the Severance Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S. The appropriation from the Severance Tax Operational Fund is made in
accordance with allocations specified in Section 39-29-109.3 (1)(d), C.R.S.
d Of this amount, $741,167(I) shall be from the Interbasin Compact Committee Operation Fund created in Section 37-75-107 (1), C.R.S., and $502,015 shall be from reserves in the
Colorado Water Conservation Board Construction Fund created in Section 37-60-121 (1)(a), C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 37-75-107 (1), C.R.S., the amount from the Interbasin Compact
Committee Operation Fund is continuously appropriated to the Colorado Water Conservation Board and is shown for informational purposes only.
e This amount shall be from the Fish and Wildlife Resources Fund created in Section 37-60-121 (6), C.R.S.
11,894,786
(7) DIVISION OF WATER RESOURCES
(A) Division Operations
Water Administration 28,339,345 27,497,244 842,101a
(261.5 FTE)
Well Inspection 379,038 379,038b
(3.0 FTE)
Satellite Monitoring System 575,204 194,968 380,236c
(2.0 FTE)
Federal Grants 230,000 230,000(I)
River Decision Support
Systems 212,467 212,467d
(2.0 FTE)
29,736,054
a Of this amount, $795,101 shall be from the Water Resources Cash Fund created in Section 37-80-111.7 (1), C.R.S., and $47,000 shall be from the Colorado Water Conservation Board
Construction Fund created in Section 37-60-121 (1)(a), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Well Inspection Cash Fund created in Section 37-80-111.5 (1)(d), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Satellite Monitoring System Cash Fund created in Section 37-80-111.5 (1)(c), C.R.S.
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1163

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
d This amount shall be from the Colorado Water Conservation Board Construction Fund created in Section 37-60-121 (1)(a), C.R.S.
(B) Special Purpose
Dam Emergency Repair 50,000 50,000a
Indirect Cost Assessment 56,431 31,051b 25,380(I)
106,431
a This amount shall be from the Colorado Water Conservation Board Construction Fund created in Section 37-60-121 (1)(a), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $16,552 shall be from the Water Resources Cash Fund created in Section 37-80-111.7 (1), C.R.S., and $14,499 shall be from the Colorado Water Conservation Board
Construction Fund created in Section 37-60-121 (1)(a), C.R.S.
29,842,485
(8) DIVISION OF FORESTRY
Colorado State Forest
Service at Colorado State
University 114,384 114,384
Forest Restoration and
Wildfire Risk Mitigation
Grant Program 8,000,000 8,000,000
Healthy Forests and Vibrant
Communities 2,245,640 2,245,640
10,360,024
TOTALS PART XV
(NATURAL
RESOURCES) $476,460,929 $57,080,902 $367,162,434a $9,587,533b $42,630,060c
$472,958,845 $56,275,838 $364,539,975a $9,559,644b $42,583,388c
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1163

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, $35,474,230 contains an (I) notation and an estimated $31,417,277 $31,433,471 is from the Severance Tax Operational Fund pursuant to Section 39-29-109.3 (1), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $1,115,249 $1,121,171 contains an (I) notation.
c This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
76 Department of Natural Resources, Executive Director's Office, Administration -- In addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108, C.R.S.,
the Department may transfer up to 5.0 percent of the total appropriation among the following line items in this section: Personal Services and Operating
Expenses.
77 Department of Natural Resources, Division of Reclamation, Mining, and Safety, Inactive Mines, Program Costs -- This appropriation remains available until
completion of the project or the close of the 2027-28 state fiscal year, whichever comes first.
78 Department of Natural Resources, Energy and Carbon Management Commission, Emergency Response -- It is the General Assembly's intent that this
appropriation be expended if there is an oil and gas related emergency under the jurisdiction of the Energy and Carbon Management Commission. The purpose
of this appropriation is to fund investigation, prevention, monitoring, and mitigation of circumstances caused by or that are alleged to be associated with oil
and gas activities and that call for immediate action by the Energy and Carbon Management Commission.
79 Department of Natural Resources, Division of Parks and Wildlife, Colorado Parks and Wildlife Operations, Wildlife Operations -- It is the General Assembly's
intent that $1,835,732 General Fund appropriated for this line item be used for the implementation of Proposition 114 for the reintroduction and management
of gray wolves.
80 Department of Natural Resources, Division of Parks and Wildlife, Colorado Parks and Wildlife Operations, Wildlife Operations -- It is the General Assembly's
intent that the portion of these funds that are intended to be appropriated for the implementation of Proposition 114 not be spent on any future wolf
reintroduction unless and until all state funded preventative measures discussed by the Parks and Wildlife Commission as part of its denial of a citizen petition
to halt wolf reintroduction during its January 8, 2025, meeting are implemented to the highest degree possible to assist owners of livestock in preventing and
resolving conflicts between gray wolves and livestock. These measures specifically include, but are not limited to, placement of an appropriate number of
trained range riders in all the areas where wolves are physically located to assist owners of livestock in preventing and resolving conflicts between gray wolves
and livestock, development and implementation of depredation response operation teams proximate to such areas, deployment of additional nonlethal conflict
techniques, and implementation of site assessment and collaboration with the Colorado Department of Agriculture on carcass management programs to
minimize attractants.
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1163

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
81 Department of Natural Resources, Division of Parks and Wildlife, Special Purpose, Off-highway Vehicle Direct Services -- This appropriation remains
available for expenditure until the completion of the project or the close of the 2027-28 state fiscal year, whichever comes first.
82 Department of Natural Resources, Division of Parks and Wildlife, Special Purpose, Grants and Habitat Partnerships -- This appropriation remains available
for expenditure until the completion of the project or the close of the 2027-28 state fiscal year, whichever comes first.
83 Department of Natural Resources, Division of Parks and Wildlife, Special Purpose, Outdoor Equity Grant Program -- This appropriation remains available
for expenditure until the completion of the project or the close of the 2027-28 state fiscal year, whichever comes first.
84 Department of Natural Resources, Division of Parks and Wildlife, Special Purpose, Asset Maintenance and Repairs -- This appropriation remains available
for expenditure until the completion of the project or the close of the 2027-28 state fiscal year, whichever comes first.
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1163

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1163